Hawaii statutes.
§336-4 Expenses. All expenses incurred
in returning such persons to another state shall be paid by the State, but the
expense of returning residents of the State shall be borne by the state making
the return.

The cost and expense incurred in effecting the
transportation of such persons shall be paid from the funds appropriated for
that purpose, or if no funds are available, then from the money appropriated
for the care of the insane, or incompetent and delinquent, as may be necessary,
upon vouchers approved by the director of health. [L 1927, c 235, §§4, 5; RL
1935, §1013; am L 1939, c 203, §3; RL 1945, §3824; RL 1955, §84-4; am L Sp 1959
2d, c 1, §19; HRS §336-4]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next